District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Public Insurance Adjuster Licensure Act of 2002.”

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 1, 50 DCR 238

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-3811 and § 31-631.